Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 2. Commonwealth Transportation Board; Powers and Duties.
§ 33.2-214.4.
Statewide prioritization for the Commonwealth Mass Transit Fund.

The Board shall develop a prioritization process for the use of funds allocated pursuant to subdivision D 2 of §

33.2-1526.1

. Such prioritization process shall be used for the development of the Six-Year Improvement Program adopted annually by the Board pursuant to §

33.2-214

. There shall be a separate prioritization process for state of good repair projects and major expansion projects. The prioritization process shall, for state of good repair projects, be based upon transit asset management principles, including federal requirements for Transit Asset Management pursuant to 49 U.S.C. § 5326. The prioritization process shall, for major expansion projects, be based on an objective and quantifiable analysis that considers the following factors relative to the cost of a major expansion project: congestion mitigation, economic development, accessibility, safety, environmental quality, and land use.
A. 1. The Board shall develop a prioritization process for the use of funds allocated pursuant to subdivision D 2 of §

33.2-1526.1

. Such prioritization process shall be used for the development of the Six-Year Improvement Program adopted annually by the Board pursuant to §

33.2-214

. There shall be a separate prioritization process for state of good repair projects and major expansion projects. The prioritization process shall, for state of good repair projects, be based upon transit asset management principles, including federal requirements for Transit Asset Management pursuant to 49 U.S.C. § 5326. The prioritization process shall, for major expansion projects, be based on an objective and quantifiable analysis that considers the following factors relative to the cost of a major expansion project: congestion mitigation, economic development, accessibility, safety, environmental quality, and land use.

The Board shall solicit input from localities, metropolitan planning organizations, transit authorities, transportation authorities, and other stakeholders in its development of the prioritization process pursuant to this subsection. Further, the Board shall explicitly consider input provided by an applicable metropolitan planning organization or the Northern Virginia Transportation Authority when developing the prioritization process set forth in subdivision 1 for a metropolitan planning area with a population of over 200,000 individuals.

The Board shall create for the Department of Rail and Public Transportation a Transit Service Delivery Advisory Committee, consisting of two members appointed by the Virginia Transit Association, one member appointed by the Community Transportation Association of Virginia, one member appointed by the Virginia Municipal League, one member appointed by the Virginia Association of Counties, and three members appointed by the Director of the Department of Rail and Public Transportation, to advise the Department of Rail and Public Transportation in the development of the process set forth in subdivision 2. The Transit Service Delivery Advisory Committee shall elect a chairman from among its membership. The Department of Rail and Public Transportation shall provide administrative support to the Transit Service Delivery Advisory Committee. The Transit Service Delivery Advisory Committee shall meet at least annually and consult with interested stakeholders and hold at least one public hearing and report its findings to the Director of the Department of Rail and Public Transportation.
B. 1. The Board shall create for the Department of Rail and Public Transportation a Transit Service Delivery Advisory Committee, consisting of two members appointed by the Virginia Transit Association, one member appointed by the Community Transportation Association of Virginia, one member appointed by the Virginia Municipal League, one member appointed by the Virginia Association of Counties, and three members appointed by the Director of the Department of Rail and Public Transportation, to advise the Department of Rail and Public Transportation in the development of the process set forth in subdivision 2. The Transit Service Delivery Advisory Committee shall elect a chairman from among its membership. The Department of Rail and Public Transportation shall provide administrative support to the Transit Service Delivery Advisory Committee. The Transit Service Delivery Advisory Committee shall meet at least annually and consult with interested stakeholders and hold at least one public hearing and report its findings to the Director of the Department of Rail and Public Transportation.

The Department of Rail and Public Transportation, in conjunction with the Transit Service Delivery Advisory Committee, shall develop a process for the distribution of the funds allocated pursuant to subdivision D 1 of §

33.2-1526.1

and the incorporation by transit systems of the service delivery factors set forth therein into their transit development plans. Prior to the Board approving service delivery factors, the Director of the Department of Rail and Public Transportation and the Chairman of the Transit Service Delivery Advisory Committee shall brief the House Committees on Appropriations and Transportation and the Senate Committees on Finance and Appropriations and on Transportation regarding the findings and recommendations of the Transit Service Delivery Advisory Committee and the Department of Rail and Public Transportation. Before redefining any component of the service delivery factors, the Board shall consult with the Director of the Department of Rail and Public Transportation, the Transit Service Delivery Advisory Committee, and interested stakeholders, and shall provide for a 45-day public comment period. The process required to be delivered by this subsection shall be adopted no later than July 1, 2019, and shall apply beginning with the fiscal year 2020-2025 Six-Year Improvement Program.

History.

2018, cc. 854, 856; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2018 acts having been §

33.2-214.3

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2018, cc. 854 and
856, cl. 9 provides: “That the Department of Rail and Public Transportation shall develop a prioritization process as required by
§

33.2-214.4

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, for the Commonwealth Transportation Board’s consideration. The Board shall implement the prioritization process required by
§

33.2-214.4

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, no later than July 1, 2019, and use such process for the development of the Six-Year Improvement Program for fiscal years 2020 through 2025.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committees on Finance and Appropriations and on Transportation” for “Senate Committees on Finance and Transportation.” March 10, 2021.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, and substituted “subdivision D” for “subdivision C” in subsection A; and substituted “subdivision D” for “subdivision C” in subdivision B 1.

§ 33.2-215.
Policies and operation of Departments.

The Board shall have the power and duty to review and approve policies and transportation objectives of the Department of Transportation and the Department of Rail and Public Transportation, to assist in establishing such policies and objectives, to oversee the execution thereof, and to report on these policies and objectives to the Commissioner of Highways and the Director of the Department of Rail and Public Transportation, respectively.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-12; 1956, c. 92; 1964, c. 265; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-12; 1974, c. 462; 1977, c. 150; 1978, c. 650; 1986, Sp. Sess., c. 13; 1988, cc. 844, 903; 1989, c. 727; 1992, c. 167; 1995, c. 94; 2001, c. 349; 2003, cc. 281, 533, 560; 2004, c. 110; 2005, cc. 839, 919; 2006, cc. 197, 417, 833, 924; 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 8; 2007, c. 337; 2008, Sp. Sess. II, c. 5; 2009, cc. 670, 690; 2011, cc. 104, 164; 2012, cc. 729, 733; 2013, cc. 388, 569, 585, 646, 741; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-216.
Roadside memorials; penalty.

The Board shall establish regulations regarding size, distance from the roadway, and other safety concerns to govern the installation, maintenance, and removal of roadside memorials, plaques, and other devices placed within the right-of-way that commemorate the memory of persons killed in vehicle crashes within the right-of-way of any state highway.

Any person who installs any plaque, device, sign, object, material, or other memorial within the right-of-way of any highway controlled by the Department except in accordance with criteria established as provided in this section may be assessed a civil penalty of no more than $100. Each occurrence shall be subject to a separate penalty. All civil penalties collected under this section shall be paid into the Highway Maintenance and Operating Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1530

.

History.

2002, c. 96, § 33.1-206.1; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-217.
Prohibition of certain weeds and plants on highway rights-of-way.

Neither the Board nor the Commissioner of Highways shall plant or cause or suffer to be planted on the right-of-way of any state highway any of the weeds or plants known as devil shoestring (
Tephrosia virginiana
), Johnson grass (

Sorghum halepense

), or barberry (

Berberis vulgaris

) if the governing body of the county in which the highway is located declares by resolution such weeds or plants to be injurious to adjacent property.

The Board shall cause all such weeds or plants planted or caused to be planted by the Board or Commissioner of Highways on any state highway right-of-way to be dug up and destroyed.

Any owner of land adjacent to any state or other public highway right-of-way, or his agents and employees, may dig up, cut down, or otherwise remove and destroy any of such plants or weeds and any other plants or weeds that are or may become noxious or otherwise injurious to his property found growing upon any state or other public highway right-of-way adjacent to his land.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-124; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-209; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-218.
Fees for participating in the Integrated Directional Sign Program.

The Board shall establish reasonable fees to be collected by the Commissioner of Highways from any qualified entity for the purpose of participating in the Integrated Directional Sign Program (IDSP) administered by the Department or its agents that is designed to provide information to the motoring public relating to gasoline and motor vehicle services, food, lodging, attractions, or other categories as defined by the IDSP. Such fees shall be deposited into a special fund specifically accounted for and used by the Commissioner of Highways solely to defray the actual costs of supervising and administering the signage programs. Included in these costs shall be a reasonable margin, not to exceed 10 percent, in the nature of a reserve fund.

History.

2005, c. 491, § 33.1-12.01; 2014, c. 805.

Editor’s note.

Former § 33.1-12.01, from which this section was derived, was enacted by Acts
2005, c. 491, and codified at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 33.2-219.
Statements to be filed with Commonwealth Transportation Board by transit systems.

Any transit system that conducts its operations within the exclusive jurisdiction of any locality or within the boundaries of any district as defined in §

33.2-1901

, and any adjoining locality, shall file annually with the Board such financial and other statistical data as the Board shall require in order to effectively administer the provisions of § 46.2-206 and shall file with the Department of Rail and Public Transportation, at such times as the Department of Rail and Public Transportation shall require, such information as the Department of Rail and Public Transportation shall require to carry out its duties under subdivision 4 of §

33.2-285

.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed so as to exempt any such transit system from any provision of law or regulation made pursuant to law that requires the filing of data with any other agency of the Commonwealth.

History.

1972, c. 290, § 33.1-223.1; 1984, c. 760; 1992, c. 167; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-220.
Transfer of interest in and control over certain highways, highway rights-of-way, and landings.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this title, the Board, upon receipt of a written request from a public access authority established pursuant to Title 15.2 and without first abandoning or discontinuing such highway, highway right-of-way, or landing, including a wharf, pier, or dock, may transfer to such requesting authority any and all rights and interests of the Board in a highway, highway right-of-way, or landing as the Board may deem in the public interest. Such transfer may be either with or without compensation from the requesting authority.

History.

2007, c. 304, § 33.1-223.2:17; 2011, c. 667; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-221.
Other powers, duties, and responsibilities.

The Board shall have the power and duty to comply fully with the provisions of the present or future federal aid acts. The Board may enter into all contracts or agreements with the United States government and may do all other things necessary to carry out fully the cooperation contemplated and provided for by present or future acts of Congress related to transportation.

The Board shall have the power and duty to enter into all contracts with other states necessary for the proper coordination of the location, construction, maintenance, improvement, and operation of transportation systems, including the systems of state highways with the highways of such other states, and where necessary, seek the approval of such contracts by the Congress of the United States.

The Board shall have the power and duty to administer, distribute, and allocate funds in the Transportation Trust Fund as provided by law. The Board shall ensure that the total funds allocated to any highway construction project are equal to total expenditures within 12 months following completion of the project.

The Board shall have the power and duty, with the advice of the Secretary of Finance and the State Treasurer, to engage a financial advisor and investment advisor who may be anyone within or without the government of the Commonwealth to assist in planning and making decisions concerning the investment of funds and the use of bonds for transportation purposes. The work of these advisors shall be coordinated with the Secretary of Finance and the State Treasurer.

The Board shall have the power and duty to enter into payment agreements with the Treasury Board related to payments on bonds issued by the Commonwealth Transportation Board.

When the traffic-carrying capacity of any of the systems of state highways or a portion thereof is increased by construction or improvement, the Board may enter into agreements with localities, authorities, and transportation districts to establish highway user fees for such system of state highways or portion thereof that the localities, authorities, and transportation districts maintain.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-12; 1956, c. 92; 1964, c. 265; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-12; 1974, c. 462; 1977, c. 150; 1978, c. 650; 1986, Sp. Sess., c. 13; 1988, cc. 844, 903; 1989, c. 727; 1992, c. 167; 1995, c. 94; 2001, c. 349; 2003, cc. 281, 533, 560; 2004, c. 110; 2005, cc. 839, 919; 2006, cc. 197, 417, 833, 924; 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 8; 2007, c. 337; 2008, Sp. Sess. II, c. 5; 2009, cc. 670, 690; 2011, cc. 104, 164; 2012, cc. 729, 733; 2013, cc. 388, 569, 585, 646, 741; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 684.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 684 in subsection C deleted “However, this requirement shall not apply to debt service appointments pursuant to § 33.2-362 or

33.2-364

” at the end.

§ 33.2-221.1.
Use of biodiesel and other alternative fuels in vehicles providing public transportation.

As used in this section, unless the context requires a different meaning, “biodiesel fuel” means a renewable, biodegradable, mono-alkyl ester combustible liquid fluid fuel from agricultural plant oils or animal fats that meets the applicable American Society for Testing and Materials (ASTM) Specification for Biodiesel Fuel (B100) Blend Stock for Distillate Fuels.

The Board shall encourage the use of biodiesel fuel and other alternative fuels, to the extent practicable, in buses and other vehicles used to provide public transportation in the Commonwealth.

History.

2006, c. 939, §§ 67-500, 67-501; 2006, c. 939, §§ 67-500, 67-501; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides:
“That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”